Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE F. MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICTS

CHAPTER 8166. CIBOLO CREEK MUNICIPAL AUTHORITY

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 8166.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "district" means the Cibolo Creek Municipal Authority.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 3166), Sec. 1.10, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 8166.002. NATURE OF DISTRICT. The district is a conservation and reclamation district in Bexar, Comal, and Guadalupe Counties created under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 3166), Sec. 1.10, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 8166.003. FINDINGS OF BENEFIT AND PUBLIC PURPOSE. (a) The district is created to serve a public use and benefit.

(b) All land and other property included in the boundaries of the district will benefit from the works and projects accomplished by the district under the powers conferred by Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

(c) The creation of the district is essential to accomplish the purposes of Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 3166), Sec. 1.10, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 8166.004. DISTRICT TERRITORY. (a) The district is composed of the territory described by Section 4, Chapter 347, Acts of the 62nd Legislature, Regular Session, 1971 (Article 8280-487, Vernon's Texas Civil Statutes), as that territory may have been modified under:

(1) Subchapter H, Chapter 54, Water Code;

(2) Subchapter J, Chapter 49, Water Code; or

(3) other law.

(b) The boundaries and field notes of the district form a closure. A mistake in the field notes or in copying the field notes in the legislative process does not affect:

(1) the district's organization, existence, and validity;

(2) the district's right to issue any type of bond for a purpose for which the district is created or to pay the principal of and interest on the bond;

(3) the district's right to impose a tax; or

(4) the legality or operation of the district or its governing body.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 3166), Sec. 1.10, eff. April 1, 2009.

SUBCHAPTER B. BOARD OF DIRECTORS

Sec. 8166.051. COMPOSITION OF BOARD. The board of directors is composed of five elected directors.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 3166), Sec. 1.10, eff. April 1, 2009.

SUBCHAPTER C. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 8166.101. MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICT AND WASTE DISPOSAL POWERS. The district has the rights, powers, privileges, and functions provided by general law applicable to a municipal utility district, including Chapters 49 and 54, Water Code, and applicable to a river authority under Chapter 30, Water Code.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 3166), Sec. 1.10, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 8166.102. WATER SUPPLY IN AND TO MUNICIPALITY. (a) The powers granted by Section 8166.101 do not include the power to supply water for municipal uses, domestic uses, or commercial purposes, on a retail basis in the municipal limits or extraterritorial jurisdiction of a municipality that lies wholly or partly in the district.

(b) A municipality described by Subsection (a) may contract with the district to supply surface water to the municipality for resale. The municipality shall bear the full cost of the development, transportation, distribution, and treatment of the water.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 3166), Sec. 1.10, eff. April 1, 2009.

SUBCHAPTER D. GENERAL FINANCIAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 8166.151. LIMITATION ON USE OF SEWAGE SYSTEM REVENUE. The district may not use revenue received from the district sewage system, including from the collection, transportation, treatment, or disposal of sewage, and from other purposes pertaining to the system, to pay for surface water development, transportation, distribution, or treatment.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 3166), Sec. 1.10, eff. April 1, 2009.

SUBCHAPTER E. BONDS

Sec. 8166.201. AUTHORITY TO ISSUE BONDS. (a) The district has the rights, powers, duties, and obligations of an issuer under Chapter 1371, Government Code.

(b) Section 49.181, Water Code, does not apply to the district.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 308 (H.B. 2162), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.